apertium-sv-da.sv.dix
<pardef n="cp-both\Ø_LR_s\'__case" c="As above, but with ' in the genitive case.">
   <e r="RL"><p><l></l>         <r><s n="cmp"/></r></p></e>
   <e r="LR"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="cmp"/><s n="compound-only-L"/></r></p></e>
   <e r="LR"><p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="cmp"/><s n="compound-only-L"/></r></p></e>
   <e>       <p><l>-</l>         <r><s n="cmp-split"/></r></p></e>
   <e r="LR"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="compound-R"/></r></p></e>
   <e>       <p><l></l>          <r></r></p></e>
   <e r="LR"><p><l>'</l>         <r><s n="gen"/><s n="compound-R"/></r></p></e>
   <e>       <p><l>'</l>         <r><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>


<pardef n="cp-both\e\S__case" c="cp-L and cp-R. Analyse only -e- in compounds, generate -e- if cp-L">
   <e r="RL"><p><l>e</l>         <r><s n="cmp"/></r></p></e>
   <e r="LR"><p><l>e</l>         <r><s n="cmp"/><s n="compound-only-L"/></r></p></e>
   <e>       <p><l>e-</l>        <r><s n="cmp-split"/></r></p></e>
   <e r="LR"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="compound-R"/></r></p></e>
   <e>       <p><l></l>          <r></r></p></e>
   <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="cp-both\s\S__case" c="cp-L and cp-R. Analyse only -s- in compounds, generate -s- if cp-L">
   <e r="RL"><p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="cmp"/></r></p></e>
   <e r="LR"><p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="cmp"/><s n="compound-only-L"/></r></p></e>
   <e>       <p><l>s-</l>        <r><s n="cmp-split"/></r></p></e>
   <e r="LR"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="compound-R"/></r></p></e>
   <e>       <p><l></l>          <r></r></p></e>
   <e r="LR"><p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="gen"/><s n="compound-R"/></r></p></e>
   <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="cp-both\s\'__case" c="As above, but with ' in the genitive case">
   <e r="RL"><p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="cmp"/></r></p></e>
   <e r="LR"><p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="cmp"/><s n="compound-only-L"/></r></p></e>
   <e>       <p><l>s-</l>        <r><s n="cmp-split"/></r></p></e>
   <e r="LR"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="compound-R"/></r></p></e>
   <e>       <p><l></l>          <r></r></p></e>
   <e r="LR"><p><l>'</l>         <r><s n="gen"/><s n="compound-R"/></r></p></e>
   <e>       <p><l>'</l>         <r><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="cp-both\Ø\S__case" c="cp-L and cp-R. Analyse only -Ø- in compounds, generate -Ø- if cp-L">
   <e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="cmp"/></r></p></e>
   <e r="LR"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="cmp"/><s n="compound-only-L"/></r></p></e>
   <e>       <p><l>-</l>         <r><s n="cmp-split"/></r></p></e>
   <e r="LR"><p><l>s-</l>        <r><s n="cmp-split"/></r></p></e>
   <e r="LR"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="compound-R"/></r></p></e>
   <e>       <p><l></l>          <r></r></p></e>
   <e r="LR"><p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="gen"/><s n="compound-R"/></r></p></e>
   <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="cp-both\Ø\'__case" c="As above, but with ' in the genitive case">
   <e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="cmp"/></r></p></e>
   <e r="LR"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="cmp"/><s n="compound-only-L"/></r></p></e>
   <e>       <p><l>-</l>         <r><s n="cmp-split"/></r></p></e>
   <e r="LR"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="compound-R"/></r></p></e>
   <e>       <p><l></l>          <r></r></p></e>
   <e r="LR"><p><l>'</l>         <r><s n="gen"/><s n="compound-R"/></r></p></e>
   <e>       <p><l>'</l>         <r><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

    <!-- Punctuation -->

<pardef n="numeros">
  <e>       <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?(%)?</re><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>

  <e a="PT">       <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l><b/>DKK</l><r><b/>DKK<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
  <e a="PT">       <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l><b/>EUR</l><r><b/>EUR<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
  <e a="PT">       <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l><b/>kr</l><r><b/>kr<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
  <e a="PT">       <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l><b/>NOK</l><r><b/>NOK<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
  <e a="PT">       <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l><b/>riksdaler</l><r><b/>riksdaler<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
  <e a="PT">       <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l><b/>SEK</l><r><b/>SEK<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
  <e a="PT">       <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l><b/>tkr</l><r><b/>tkr<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
  <e a="PT">       <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l><b/>USD</l><r><b/>USD<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
  
  <e a="PT">       <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l><b/>ton</l><r><b/>ton<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
  <e a="PT">       <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l><b/>kg</l><r><b/>kg<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
  <e a="PT">       <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l><b/>hg</l><r><b/>hg<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
  <e a="PT">       <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l><b/>g</l><r><b/>g<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
  <e a="PT">       <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l><b/>mg</l><r><b/>mg<s n="num"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l><b/>km</l><r><b/>km<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
  <e a="PT">       <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l><b/>m</l><r><b/>m<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
  <e a="PT">       <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l><b/>dm</l><r><b/>dm<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l><b/>cm</l><r><b/>cm<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l><b/>mm</l><r><b/>mm<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
  
  <e a="PT">       <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l><b/>har</l><r><b/>har<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
  <e a="PT">       <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l><b/>ar</l><r><b/>ar<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
  <e a="PT">       <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l><b/>kvm</l><r><b/>kvm<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
  <e a="PT">       <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l><b/>kvcm</l><r><b/>kvcm<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
  
  <e a="PT">       <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l><b/>MB</l><r><b/>MB<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
  <e a="PT">       <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l><b/>kB</l><r><b/>kB<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
  <e a="PT">       <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l><b/>Mb</l><r><b/>Mb<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
  <e a="PT">       <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l><b/>kb</l><r><b/>kb<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
  <e a="PT">       <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l><b/>MHz</l><r><b/>MHz<s n="num"/></r></p></e>

  <e a="PT">       <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l><b/>kV</l><r><b/>kV<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
  <e a="PT">       <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l><b/>kW</l><r><b/>kW<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
  <e a="PT">       <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l><b/>kWh</l><r><b/>kWh<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
  <e a="PT">       <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l><b/>MW</l><r><b/>MW<s n="num"/></r></p></e>

  <e a="PT">       <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l><b/>hk</l><r><b/>hk<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
  <e a="PT">       <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l><b/>kcal</l><r><b/>kcal<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
  <e a="PT">       <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l><b/>km/h</l><r><b/>km/h<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
  <e a="PT">       <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l><b/>kp</l><r><b/>kp<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
  <e a="PT">       <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l><b/>m/s</l><r><b/>m/s<s n="num"/></r></p></e> 
  <e a="PT">       <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l><b/>N</l><r><b/>N<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
  <e a="PT">       <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l><b/>N</l><r><b/>Nm<s n="num"/></r></p></e>

  <e a="PT">       <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l><b/>krm</l><r><b/>krm<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
  <e a="PT">       <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l><b/>msk</l><r><b/>msk/h<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
  <e a="PT">       <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l><b/>tsk</l><r><b/>tsk<s n="num"/></r></p></e>


<!-- senere
  <e>       <re>[1-9]+([0-9]+)?(%)?</re><p><l>-årige</l><r>-årige<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <re>[MCDXVLI]+</re><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
-->

</pardef>

<pardef n="separa">
  <e>       <re>[.\?;:!]</re><p><l></l><r><s n="sent"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e>                      <par n="separa"/></e>
<e>                      <par n="numeros"/></e>
